Washington statutes.
RCW 8.12.010

"City" defined.

The term "city," when used in this chapter, means and includes every city and town and each unclassified city and town in the state of Washington.

[ 1915 c 154 s 20; RRS s 9272.]

NOTES:

Severability—1915 c 154: "An adjudication of invalidity of any part of this act shall not affect the validity of the act as a whole or any part thereof." [ 1915 c 154 s 19; RRS s 9271.] This applies to RCW 8.12.010 through 8.12.560.